Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-605
Dogs; collar required.

It shall be the duty of every owner or owners of any dog or dogs to securely place upon the neck of such dog or dogs a good and sufficient collar with a metallic plate thereon. The plate shall be plainly inscribed with the name of such owner.

Laws 1877, § 5, p. 157;

R.S.1913, § 176;

C.S.1922, § 173;

C.S.1929, § 54-605;

R.S.1943, § 54-605;

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 12.

Dog under control of owner is not running at large. Brown v. Graham, 80 Neb. 281, 114 N.W. 153 (1907).

Dog is running at large when he leaves the owner's premises or goes upon the public road, and no one having control of him is near. Nehr v. State, 35 Neb. 638, 53 N.W. 589 (1892).